Louisiana, session 2026, HB1000.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:229.1(F) and (H), 231(A)(5), and 251(B) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§229.1. Statewide prioritization process for the Highway Priority Program
* * *
F. The department shall include in its annual submission of the highway
priority program Highway Priority Program a detailed list of any changes to the
completed previous year's program, along with an explanation of the reasons such
changes were made. It shall be the goal of the department to ensure that at least
ninety percent of its projects in the program progress as provided for in the
completed previous year's program submission. The legislative auditor shall monitor
the program and make an annual determination of the percentage of accuracy.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1000 ENROLLED
H. The department shall provide a report on the status of projects included
in the current Highway Priority Program to the House and Senate committees on
transportation, highways and public works annually.
* * *
§231. Final construction program for current fiscal year; public hearings; Joint
Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works; reports; review
by legislature; restrictions on legislature
A.
* * *
(5) A report based on the testimony received at the hearings shall be sent to
the department and the House and Senate committees on transportation, highways
and public works. The department shall then create the final construction program
for the coming fiscal year for submission to the legislature. Any project discussed
at the hearing that is not included in the final construction program for the upcoming
fiscal year shall be given numerical identification and the department shall provide
the aforementioned committees with a list of the projects along with written
justification for the exclusion of each individual project on or before the first of
October of the following fiscal year.
* * *
§251. Contracts for projects
* * *
B. Every contract exceeding the contract limit, as defined in this Subsection,
for construction, maintenance, or improvement of a department facility under the
provisions of this Part shall be made in the name of the department and shall be
signed by the secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development or his
duly appointed designee and by the contracting party. The contract limit for this Part
is hereby defined to equal one three million dollars. No contract shall be entered into
nor shall any work be authorized which will create a liability on the part of the state
in excess of the funds available or which will be available for the project.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1000 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.